Hawaii statutes.
[§672E-6] Offer of settlement. Any
time after the service of the notice of claim, any party may serve an offer of
settlement. If the offer is accepted, the parties shall be deemed to have
resolved the claim in whole or in part pursuant to the offer. An offer not
accepted within ten days after service shall be deemed withdrawn and evidence
thereof is not admissible except to determine costs. If the judgment or award
obtained in a subsequent proceeding is not more favorable than the offer, the
offeree shall pay the costs incurred by the offeror after the making of the
offer. The fact that an offer is made and not accepted does not preclude a
subsequent offer. [L 2004, c 119, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next